Utah statutes.
78B-3-701.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Disability" has the same meaning as defined in Section 62A-5b-102.

(2)  "Search and rescue dog" means a dog:

(a)  with documented training to locate persons who are:

(i)  lost, missing, or injured; or

(ii)  trapped under debris as the result of a natural or man-made event; and

(b)  affiliated with an established search and rescue dog organization.

(3)  "Service animal" means:

(a)  a service animal, as defined in Section 62A-5b-102; or

(b)  a search and rescue dog.



Amended by Chapter 110, 2009 General Session

